src/import/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NoninflectingAdjectives

aadamaülikonnas+A:´aadama#`ülikonnas GI ;
aadeteta+A:aadeteta GI ;
abielus+A:abi#elus GI ;
ahistamata+A:ahistamata GI ;
ajast-arust+A:ajast-arust GI ;
alasti+A:alasti GI ;
allahinnatud+A:´alla#hinnatud GI ;
allakirjutanud+A:´alla#kirjutanud GI ;
allakirjutatud+A:´alla#kirjutatud GI ;
allkirjata+A:´all#kirjata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ammukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ammukil GI ;
ammuli+A:ammuli GI ;
apelsinikarva+A:apelsini#k´arva GI ;
apelsinivärvi+A:apelsini#v´ärvi GI ;
aravõitu+A:ara#v´õitu GI ;
arenguvõimalustega+A:arengu#võimalustega GI ;
argumenteerimata+A:argument´eerimata GI ;
armupiinas+A:armu#piinas GI ;
asjata+A:as,jata GI ;
asustamata+A:asustamata GI ;
auditeerimata+A:audit´eerimata GI ;
aukudega+A:´aukudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@aukus+A:@P.Case.Ine@´aukus GI ;
austamisväärt+A:´austamis#v´äärt GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@avakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@avakil GI ;
avali+A:avali GI ;
avamata+A:avamata GI ;
barokkstiilis+A:bar´okk#stiilis GI ;
defektidega+A:def´ektidega GI ;
ebakõladega+A:eba#kõladega GI ;
eeltoodud+A:´eel#t´oodud GI ;
eesmärgita+A:´ees#märgita GI ;
eevaülikonnas+A:eeva#`ülikonnas GI ;
eht+A:´eht GI ;
eksprompt+A:eks#pr´ompt GI ;
@P.Case.Short@ekstra+A:@P.Case.Short@´ekstra GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@elevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@elevil GI ;
elukogemustega+A:elu#kogemustega GI ;
elukogemusteta+A:elu#kogemusteta GI ;
elukogenud+A:elu#kogenud GI ;
ennenägemata+A:´enne#´nägemata GI ;
enneolemata+A:´enne#´olemata GI ;
eraldi+A:eraldi GI ;
erastamata+A:erastamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@erevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@erevil GI ;
@P.Case.Short@eri+A:@P.Case.Short@eri GI ;
erkvel+A:´erkvel GI ;
esijoones+A:esi#joones GI ;
etteaimamata+A:´ette#´aimamata GI ;
ettenägemata+A:´ette#nägemata GI ;
ettesirutatud+A:´ette#sirutatud GI ;
ettevalmistuseta+A:´ette#val,mistuseta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@haarakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@haarakil GI ;
habemega+A:habemega GI ;
haigevõitu+A:h´aige#v´õitu GI ;
hajali+A:hajali GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hajuvil+A:@P.Case.Ine@hajuvil GI ;
haledavõitu+A:haleda#v´õitu GI ;
hallivõitu+A:hal,li#v´õitu GI ;
hammastega+A:hammastega GI ;
hammasteta+A:hammasteta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hanges+A:@P.Case.Ine@h´anges GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@harakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@harakil GI ;
harali+A:harali GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@haravil+A:@P.Case.Ine@haravil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@harevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@harevil GI ;
harguli+A:harguli GI ;
harimata+A:harimata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@harkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@h´arkis GI ;
harvavõitu+A:harva#v´õitu GI ;
hatul+A:hatul GI ;
heidel+A:h´eidel GI ;
hiiglamoodi+A:h´iigla#m´ood,i GI ;
hiirekarva+A:hiire#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hinges+A:@P.Case.Ine@h´inges GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hinnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hinnas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hirmukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@hirmukil GI ;
hooletuses+A:hooletuses GI ;
hoos+A:h´oos GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hukas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hukas GI ;
hulgaga+A:hulgaga GI ;
huumorimeelega+A:h´uumori#meelega GI ;
huumorisoonega+A:h´uumori#soonega GI ;
hõredavõitu+A:hõreda#v´õitu GI ;
hõõgvel+A:h´õõgvel GI ;
häbiväärt+A:häbi#v´äärt GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hädas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hädas GI ;
hälvetega+A:hälvetega GI ;
hämaravõitu+A:hämara#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@hämus+A:@P.Case.Ine@hämus GI ;
härjaturjaga+A:härja#turjaga GI ;
härmarüüs+A:härma#r´üüs GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@härmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@h´ärmas GI ;
hääleõigusega+A:hääle#´õigusega GI ;
ideaalideta+A:ide´aalideta GI ;
igavavõitu+A:igava#v´õitu GI ;
ihnevõitu+A:´ihne#v´õitu GI ;
ihukarva+A:ihu#k´arva GI ;
ihuvärvi+A:ihu#v´ärvi GI ;
ilmajäänud+A:ilma#jäänud GI ;
imekspanemisväärt+A:imeks#panemis#v´äärt GI ;
individuaalsuseta+A:individu´aalsuseta GI ;
innal+A:innal GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@irevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@irevil GI ;
irruli+A:irruli GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@irvakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@irvakil GI ;
@P.Case.Short@ise+A:@P.Case.Short@ise GI ;
iseloomuta+A:ise#loomuta GI ;
iseteenindusega+A:ise#teenindusega GI ;
isevärki+A:ise#v´ärki GI ;
isikuta+A:isikuta GI ;
isikuteta+A:isikuteta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@itsikil+A:@P.Case.Ine@it,sikil GI ;
jahedavõitu+A:jaheda#v´õitu GI ;
jokk+A:j´okk GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@jokkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j´okkis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@jommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j´ommis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@joobes+A:@P.Case.Ine@j´oobes GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@jooksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@jooksus GI ;
joontega+A:joontega GI ;
juurteta+A:juurteta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@jõllis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j´õl,lis GI ;
jõnksudega+A:j´õnksudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@jõrris+A:@P.Case.Ine@j´õrris GI ;
järelejätmata+A:järele#j´ätmata GI ;
järelevalvenõukogu+A:järele#v´alve#n´õu#kogu GI ;
jääkammitsas+A:j´ää#kammitsas GI ;
jääs+A:j´ääs GI ;
jäävangis+A:j´ää#vangis GI ;
kaalumata+A:k´aalumata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kaardus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´aardus GI ;
kaarnakarva+A:k´aarna#k´arva GI ;
kaelani+A:kaelani GI ;
kahjustamata+A:kahjustamata GI ;
kahkvel+A:k´ahkvel GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kahlus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ahlus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kahukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kahukil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kahus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kahus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kaisus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kaisus GI ;
kaitseta+A:k´aitseta GI ;
kaitsmata+A:k´aitsmata GI ;
kalkvel+A:k´alkvel GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kallakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kallakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kaltsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´altsus GI ;
kammitsas+A:kammitsas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kampas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ampas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kantis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´an,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@karpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´arpas GI ;
karva+A:k´arva GI ;
karvadeta+A:k´arvadeta GI ;
karvasjalg+A:karvas#j´alg GI ;
kasimata+A:kasimata GI ;
kasutamata+A:kasutamata GI ;
kasvu+A:k´asvu GI ;
kasvuvõimalustega+A:kasvu#võimalustega GI ;
katmata+A:k´atmata GI ;
kaugõppes+A:k´aug#´õppes GI ;
kavaldamata+A:kavaldamata GI ;
kavaluseta+A:kavaluseta GI ;
keerdudega+A:k´eerdudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@keerdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´eerdus GI ;
keerukuseta+A:keerukuseta GI ;
keerutamata+A:keerutamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kehevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kehevil GI ;
kehkvel+A:k´ehkvel GI ;
kehvavõitu+A:kehva#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kenus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kenus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@keras+A:@P.Case.Ine@keras GI ;
kerkvel+A:k´erkvel GI ;
kiduravõitu+A:kidura#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kihevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kihevil GI ;
kihkvel+A:k´ihkvel GI ;
kiikvel+A:k´iikvel GI ;
kiimal+A:kiimal GI ;
kiirustamata+A:kiirustamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kiivas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´iivas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kikkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ikkis GI ;
kimbatuses+A:kimbatuses GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kipras+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ipras GI ;
kirgedeta+A:k´irgedeta GI ;
kirja+A:k´irja GI ;
kirjutamata+A:kirjutamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kirtsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kirtsus GI ;
kiskudega+A:k´iskudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kissis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´is,sis GI ;
kitsavõitu+A:k´itsa#v´õitu GI ;
kitsikuses+A:kit,sikuses GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@klimpis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kl´impis GI ;
kodustamata+A:kodustamata GI ;
koduta+A:koduta GI ;
kogemusteta+A:kogemusteta GI ;
kogu+A:kogu GI ;
kogupere+A:kogu#pere GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kohevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kohevil GI ;
kohkvel+A:k´ohkvel GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kohmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ohmas GI ;
kohvikarva+A:kohvi#k´arva GI ;
kokkumonteerimata+A:k´okku#mont´eerimata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kongis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ongis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kongus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ongus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@konksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´onksus GI ;
kontrollimata+A:kontr´ol,limata GI ;
kontsentreerimata+A:kontsentr´eerimata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@konukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@konukil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kookus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ookus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kooldus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ooldus GI ;
koolitamata+A:kool,itamata GI ;
koolnukarva+A:k´oolnu#k´arva GI ;
koostöönõukogu+A:k´oos#t´öö#n´õu#kogu GI ;
koristamata+A:koristamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@korpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´orpas GI ;
korraldamata+A:korraldamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@korras+A:@P.Case.Ine@korras GI ;
korrastamata+A:korrastamata GI ;
kortsudeta+A:k´ortsudeta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kortsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ortsus GI ;
kotkapilguga+A:k´otka#pilguga GI ;
kotkatiibadega+A:k´otka#t´iibadega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kottis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ot,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krampis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´ampis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kriimus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´iimus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krillis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´il,lis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krimpsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´impsus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kronksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´onksus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krussis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´us,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krõnksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´õnksus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@krässus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr´ässus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kräsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kräsus GI ;
kuivavõitu+A:kuiva#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kuklas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´uklas GI ;
kulla+A:kulla GI ;
kullakaalu+A:kulla#kaalu GI ;
kultiveerimata+A:kul,tiv´eerimata GI ;
kumaras+A:kumaras GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kummis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ummis GI ;
kummuli+A:kummuli GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kuplas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´uplas GI ;
kuradima+A:kuradima GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kurdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´urdus GI ;
kurvidega+A:k´urvidega GI ;
kutsumata+A:k´utsumata GI ;
kuulmiseta+A:k´uulmiseta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kuurdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´uurdus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kõhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kõhevil GI ;
kõhkvel+A:k´õhkvel GI ;
kõhnavõitu+A:kõhna#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kõmmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´õmmis GI ;
kõnelemata+A:kõnelemata GI ;
kõrini+A:kõrini GI ;
kõrvalekalletega+A:kõrvale#kalletega GI ;
kõvavõitu+A:kõva#v´õitu GI ;
kõveraks+A:kõveraks GI ;
kõveras+A:kõveras GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kõõmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´õõmas GI ;
käeraudus+A:k´äe#r´audus GI ;
kägaras+A:kägaras GI ;
käharas+A:käharas GI ;
kähinaga+A:kähinaga GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@käkkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´äkkis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@käkras+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´äkras GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@käkrus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´äkrus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kämpus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ämpus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kängus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ängus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kärnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ärnas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kärssus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ärssus GI ;
käänakutega+A:käänakutega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kääris+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ääris GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@könksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´önksus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@köntis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ön,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kössakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kös,sakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kössis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ös,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@köögakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@köögakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@köökus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´öökus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@köötsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@köötsakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@köötsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´öötsus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kühmus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ühmus GI ;
külmavõitu+A:külma#v´õitu GI ;
küsimata+A:küsimata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@kütkes+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´ütkes GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@küürakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@küürakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@küürus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´üürus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@küütsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@küütsakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@küütsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k´üütsus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@laabakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@laabakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@laatsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@laatsakil GI ;
lahendamata+A:lahendamata GI ;
laiavõitu+A:laia#v´õitu GI ;
laiduväärt+A:laidu#v´äärt GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@laokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´aokil GI ;
lastetoata+A:laste#t´oata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@latsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@latsakil GI ;
lausärkvel+A:l´aus#´ärkvel GI ;
leebuseta+A:l´eebuseta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lehes+A:@P.Case.Ine@lehes GI ;
lehtedeta+A:l´ehtedeta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lehtes+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ehtes GI ;
lehtimata+A:l´ehtimata GI ;
lemmel+A:lemmel GI ;
lennuga+A:lennuga GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lidukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lidukil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@lidus GI ;
liialdamata+A:liialdamata GI ;
liiast+A:liiast GI ;
liivavärvi+A:liiva#v´ärvi GI ;
lillmustriga+A:l´ill#m´ustriga GI ;
linavärvi+A:lina#v´ärvi GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lingus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ingus GI ;
loata+A:l´oata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lodakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lodevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lodus+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodus GI ;
loginaga+A:loginaga GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lohakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lohakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lohkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ohkus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lokkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´okkis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ommis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@longus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ongus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lontis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´on,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@loodis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ood,is GI ;
loogetega+A:loogetega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@loogus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´oogus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@loojas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´oojas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lookas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ookas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@loppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´oppis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@losakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@losakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´os,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lotakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lotakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lotsis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ot,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ludus+A:@P.Case.Ine@lud,us GI ;
